Tennessee, session 114, HB0177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The department of safety is urged to study the enforcement of federal
immigration laws, detentions and removals, investigations in this state, and immigration-related
progress and challenges. If such study is conducted, on or before January 1, 2026, then the
department shall submit a report, including findings and recommendations, to the governor and
general assembly.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0177
001712
- 1 -